apertium-eng-kaz1/apertium-eng-kaz.eng.dix
    <pardef n="h/ang__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ang</l>
        <r>ang<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ang</l>
        <r>ang<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>angs</l>
        <r>ang<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>anged</l>
        <r>ang<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ung</l>
        <r>ang<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>anged</l>
        <r>ang<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ung</l>
        <r>ang<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>anging</l>
        <r>ang<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>anging</l>
        <r>ang<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>anging</l>
        <r>ang<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="hear__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>s</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>d</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>d</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="hew__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>s</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ed</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ed</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>n</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="hid/e__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>es</l>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>den</l>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ing</l>
        <r>e<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="w/eave__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eave</l>
        <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eave</l>
        <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eaves</l>
        <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ove</l>
        <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>oven</l>
        <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eaving</l>
        <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eaving</l>
        <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eaving</l>
        <r>eave<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="le/ad__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ad</l>
        <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ad</l>
        <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ads</l>
        <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>d</l>
        <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>d</l>
        <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ading</l>
        <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ading</l>
        <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ading</l>
        <r>ad<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

                            <e lm="weave" i=""><i>w</i><par n="w/eave__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="hang" i=""><i>h</i><par n="h/ang__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="hear" i=""><i>hear</i><par n="hear__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="hide" i=""><i>hid</i><par n="hid/e__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="interweave" i=""><i>interw</i><par n="w/eave__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="lead" i=""><i>le</i><par n="le/ad__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="sew" i=""><i>sew</i><par n="hew__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="show" i=""><i>show</i><par n="hew__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="show up" i=""><i>show</i><par n="hew__vblex"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="hang up" i=""><i>h</i><par n="h/ang__vblex"/><p><l><b/>up</l><r><g><b/>up</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="hang-up" i=""><i>h</i><par n="h/ang__vblex"/><p><l>-up</l><r><g>-up</g></r></p></e>
